District of Columbia statutes.
1-319.01

Utilization by District government encouraged; exception.

It shall be the policy of the District of Columbia government to utilize volunteer citizens in as many governmental programs as is practicable to serve the interests of the community. No volunteer person shall be used to fill any position or perform any service which is currently being performed by an employee of the District of Columbia government.

June 28, 1977, D.C. Law 2-12, § 2, 24 DCR 1442
Merit system, continuation of existing laws, see § 1-632.06.
This section is referenced in § 1-319.03, § 1-319.04, § 1-632.06, and § 8-151.07.
1981 Ed., § 1-304.
1973 Ed., § 1-215a.